Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101.3. As used in Section 6-101 et seq. of this
title:
1. "Administrator" means a duly certified person who devotes a
majority of time to service as a superintendent, elementary
superintendent, principal, supervisor, vice principal or in any
other administrative or supervisory capacity in the school district;
2. "Dismissal" means the discontinuance of the teaching service
of an administrator or teacher during the term of a written
contract, as provided by law;
3. "Nonreemployment" means the nonrenewal of the contract of an
administrator or teacher upon expiration of the contract;
4. "Career teacher" means a teacher who:

a. is employed by a school district prior to the 2017-
2018 school year and has completed three (3) or more
consecutive complete school years as a teacher in one
school district under a written continuing or
temporary teaching contract, or
b. is employed for the first time by a school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract during the 2017-2018 school year and
thereafter, and:
(1) has completed three (3) consecutive complete
school years as a teacher in one school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract and has achieved a district evaluation
rating of "superior" as measured pursuant to the
TLE as set forth in Section 6-101.16 of this
title for at least two (2) of the three (3)
school years,
(2) has completed four (4) consecutive complete
school years as a teacher in one school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract, has averaged a district evaluation
rating of at least "effective" as measured
pursuant to the TLE for the four-year period, and
has received district evaluation ratings of at
least "effective" for the last two (2) years of
the four-year period, or
(3) has completed four (4) or more consecutive
complete school years in one school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract and has not met the requirements of
subparagraph a or b of this paragraph, only if
the principal of the school at which the teacher
is employed submits a petition to the
superintendent of the school district requesting
that the teacher be granted career status, the
superintendent agrees with the petition, and the
school district board of education approves the
petition. The principal shall specify in the
petition the underlying facts supporting the
granting of career status to the teacher, or
ENR. H. B. NO. 3671 Page 2

c. after meeting the requirements of subparagraph a or b
of this paragraph in one school district, is employed
by another school district under a written continuing
or temporary teaching contract and the board of
education of the school district has approved the
granting of career status to the teacher. Status as a
career teacher pursuant to this paragraph shall be for
evaluation purposes only;
5. "Teacher hearing" means the hearing before a school district
board of education after a recommendation for dismissal or
nonreemployment of a teacher has been made but before any final
action is taken on the recommendation, held for the purpose of
affording the teacher all rights guaranteed by the United States
Constitution and the Constitution of Oklahoma under circumstances
and for enabling the board to determine whether to approve or
disapprove the recommendation;
6. "Probationary teacher" means a teacher who:
a. is employed by a school district prior to the 2017-
2018 school year and has completed fewer than three
(3) consecutive complete school years as a teacher in
one school district under a written teaching contract,
or
b. is employed for the first time by a school district
under a written teaching contract during the 2017-2018
school year and thereafter and has not met the
requirements for career teacher as provided in
paragraph 4 of this section;
7. "Suspension" or "suspended" means the temporary
discontinuance of the services of an administrator or teacher, as
provided by law;
8. "Teacher" means a person defined as a teacher in Section 1-
116 of this title; and
9. "District evaluation rating" means the rating issued based
on the components of the TLE as set forth in subsection B of Section
6-101.16 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3671 Page 3

ENR. H. B. NO. 3671 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3671 Page 5